Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Licensing.
Sec. 21.27.410.
Denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of licenses.

The director may deny issuance of or not renew a license or may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter for any of the following:

a cause for which issuance of the license or its renewal could have been denied had it then existed and been known to the director;

a violation or participation in a violation of a provision of this title;

wilful misrepresentation or fraud by the licensee or applicant to obtain or attempt to obtain a license;

misappropriation, conversion to personal use, or illegally withholding money required to be held in a fiduciary capacity by a licensee or applicant;

with intent to deceive, material misrepresentation of the terms or effect of an insurance contract by a licensee or applicant;

twisting in violation of AS

21.36.050

or rebating in violation of AS

21.36.100

by a licensee or applicant;

conviction of a felony;

the conduct of affairs under a license if the licensee exhibits conduct considered by the director to reflect incompetence or untrustworthiness, or to be a source of potential injury and loss to the public;

the licensee or applicant dealing with, or attempting to deal with, or to exercise a power relative to, insurance outside the scope of the license of the licensee or applicant;

a licensee or applicant engaging in or about to engage in an unfair or fraudulent insurance transaction;

suspension or revocation of a license in another jurisdiction;

forgery of another’s name to an application for insurance by a licensee or applicant;

accepting insurance business from a person not licensed as required by this title if the applicant or licensee knew or should have known that the person was unlicensed.

The license of a firm and its compliance officer may be denied, nonrenewed, suspended, or revoked for a violation or cause that relates to a person representing or acting on behalf of the firm.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 25, 26 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 41 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 88 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 42 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 29 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (a)(10) — (13) were formerly (a)(13) — (16) and were renumbered in 2010 to reflect the 2009 repeal of former paragraphs (10) — (12).

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

Sec. 21.27.420.
Procedure for suspending, revoking, or conditioning a license.

After a hearing under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

, if the director determines that a person has violated a provision of this title and that the person’s license should be suspended or revoked, the director shall issue an order effective 10 days after the date of issuing that the license is suspended or revoked.

After a hearing under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

, if the director determines the person has violated a provision of this title, the director may place conditions on a person’s license if the director finds that the conditions will protect the public from injury or potential injury.

With the consent of an applicant or licensee, the director may issue or renew a license with restrictions upon the scope of the person’s license or may otherwise restrict or condition the activities of the licensee if the director determines that the person has violated the provisions of this title or to protect the public from injury or potential injury.

Without prior hearing, the director may order summary suspension of a license if the director finds that protection of the public requires emergency action and incorporates that finding in an order. The suspension is effective on the date specified in the order or on the date of mailing by first class mail to the licensee’s business address on record with the division, whichever is later. If the licensee requests a hearing, the director shall conduct a hearing on the suspension within a reasonable time but not later than 20 days after the effective date of the summary suspension unless the person whose license is suspended requests a later date. At the hearing, the director shall determine if the suspension should be continued or withdrawn and, if proper notice is given, may determine if the license should be revoked. The director shall issue a decision within 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing. If the director decides to continue the suspension or revoke the license, the suspension or revocation must be based on one or more grounds in AS

21.27.410

. The summary suspension continues until the decision is issued. AS

21.06.190

and AS

44.64.030

are not applicable to a hearing under this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 23 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 89 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 44 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 10 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Collateral references. —

Revocation or suspension of insurance agent’s license for withholding or misappropriation of premiums. 17 ALR4th 1106.

Sec. 21.27.430.
Suspensions and revocations.

An order suspending a license shall specify the period during which the license is suspended. A period of suspension may not exceed 12 months.

An order revoking a license shall specify the period during which the person may not seek to be licensed in this state or licensed relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall pay a penalty equal to all or a portion of the compensation received during the suspension or revocation relating to the transaction of insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 90 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.27.440.
Penalties.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person that the director determines under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

has violated the provisions of this chapter is subject to

a civil penalty equal to the compensation promised, paid, or to be paid, directly or indirectly, to a person in regard to each violation;

either a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation or a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation if the director determines that the person wilfully violated the provisions of this chapter; and

denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of a license.

An order issued by the director that levies a civil penalty shall specify the time period within which the civil penalty must be fully paid. The period may not be less than 15 days or more than one year after the date of the order. Upon failure to pay a civil penalty when due, the director shall revoke, without further hearing, all licenses of the licensee not already revoked.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 149 SLA 1984; am § 28 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 91 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 25 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

Sec. 21.27.450.
Fine in lieu of action against the license. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.460.
Return of license.

A license issued under this chapter is the property of the state. Within 10 days of an order or notice of nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of the license, the licensee or other person having possession or custody of the license shall deliver it to the director either personally or by certified mail.

If a license is lost, stolen, or destroyed while in the possession of the licensee or person, the director may accept, in lieu of the return of the license, an affidavit of the licensee or other person responsible for or involved in the safekeeping of the license concerning the facts of the loss, theft, or destruction.

Upon a change in the state of residence, a place of business, a mailing address, or in the compliance officer of a firm, a license subject to the change shall be surrendered to the director within 10 days either personally or by certified mail and the division shall reissue the license reflecting the changes if the licensee continues to satisfy the qualifications under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 30 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 42 ch 51 SLA 1990; am §§ 92, 93 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 43 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Secs. 21.27.470 — 21.27.520.
Agent, broker, solicitor, service representatives, and adjuster defined; exceptions from definitions. [Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]